test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NI_O_bagwaaniigin_gt-norm.yaml
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: nibagwaaniiginomishibaniin
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: nibagwaaniiginomishibaniin
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: gibagwaaniiginomishibaniing
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: gibagwaaniiginomishibaniin
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: gibagwaaniiginomishibaniin
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: obagwaaniiginomishibaniing
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: obagwaaniiginomishibaniin
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: obagwaaniiginomishibaniin
     X+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: ibagwaaniiginomishibaniing
     X+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: ibagwaaniiginomishibaniin
     X+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: ibagwaaniiginomishibaniin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5, 6, 7
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+1Pl+Pret+Loc: nibagwaaniiginominaanibaniing
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+1Pl+Pret+Obv: nibagwaaniiginominaanibaniin
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+1Pl+Pret+Pl: nibagwaaniiginominaanibaniin
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+1Pl+VocPl+Loc: [nibagwaaniiginominaanidig, nibagwaaniiginominaanidog]
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+1Pl+VocPl+Obv: [nibagwaaniiginominaanidig, nibagwaaniiginominaanidog]
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+1Pl+VocPl+Pl: [nibagwaaniiginominaanidig, nibagwaaniiginominaanidog]
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+21+Pret+Loc: gibagwaaniiginominaanibaniing
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+21+Pret+Obv: gibagwaaniiginominaanibaniin
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+21+Pret+Pl: gibagwaaniiginominaanibaniin
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+21+VocPl+Loc: [gibagwaaniiginominaanidig, gibagwaaniiginominaanidog]
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+21+VocPl+Obv: [gibagwaaniiginominaanidig, gibagwaaniiginominaanidog]
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+21+VocPl+Pl: [gibagwaaniiginominaanidig, gibagwaaniiginominaanidog]
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+2Pl+Pret+Loc: gibagwaaniiginomiwaabaniing
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+2Pl+Pret+Obv: gibagwaaniiginomiwaabaniin
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+2Pl+Pret+Pl: gibagwaaniiginomiwaabaniin
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+2Pl+VocPl+Loc: [gibagwaaniiginomiwaadig, gibagwaaniiginomiwaadog]
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+2Pl+VocPl+Obv: [gibagwaaniiginomiwaadig, gibagwaaniiginomiwaadog]
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+2Pl+VocPl+Pl: [gibagwaaniiginomiwaadig, gibagwaaniiginomiwaadog]
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+3Obv+Pret+Loc: obagwaaniiginominiibaniing
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+3Obv+Pret+Obv: obagwaaniiginominiibaniin
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+3Obv+Pret+Pl: obagwaaniiginominiibaniin
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+3Obv+VocPl+Loc: [obagwaaniiginominiidig, obagwaaniiginominiidog]
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+3Obv+VocPl+Obv: [obagwaaniiginominiidig, obagwaaniiginominiidog]
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+3Obv+VocPl+Pl: [obagwaaniiginominiidig, obagwaaniiginominiidog]
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+3Pl+Pret+Loc: obagwaaniiginomiwaabaniing
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+3Pl+Pret+Obv: obagwaaniiginomiwaabaniin
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+3Pl+Pret+Pl: obagwaaniiginomiwaabaniin
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+3Pl+VocPl+Loc: [obagwaaniiginomiwaadig, obagwaaniiginomiwaadog]
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+3Pl+VocPl+Obv: [obagwaaniiginomiwaadig, obagwaaniiginomiwaadog]
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+3Pl+VocPl+Pl: [obagwaaniiginomiwaadig, obagwaaniiginomiwaadog]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5, 6, 7
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+1Pl+Pret+Loc: nibagwaaniiginoshinaanibaniing
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+1Pl+Pret+Obv: nibagwaaniiginoshinaanibaniin
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+1Pl+Pret+Pl: nibagwaaniiginoshinaanibaniin
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+1Pl+VocPl+Loc: [nibagwaaniiginoshinaanidig, nibagwaaniiginoshinaanidog]
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+1Pl+VocPl+Obv: [nibagwaaniiginoshinaanidig, nibagwaaniiginoshinaanidog]
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+1Pl+VocPl+Pl: [nibagwaaniiginoshinaanidig, nibagwaaniiginoshinaanidog]
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+21+Pret+Loc: gibagwaaniiginoshinaanibaniing
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+21+Pret+Obv: gibagwaaniiginoshinaanibaniin
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+21+Pret+Pl: gibagwaaniiginoshinaanibaniin
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+21+VocPl+Loc: [gibagwaaniiginoshinaanidig, gibagwaaniiginoshinaanidog]
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+21+VocPl+Obv: [gibagwaaniiginoshinaanidig, gibagwaaniiginoshinaanidog]
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+21+VocPl+Pl: [gibagwaaniiginoshinaanidig, gibagwaaniiginoshinaanidog]
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+2Pl+Pret+Loc: gibagwaaniiginoshiwaabaniing
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+2Pl+Pret+Obv: gibagwaaniiginoshiwaabaniin
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+2Pl+Pret+Pl: gibagwaaniiginoshiwaabaniin
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+2Pl+VocPl+Loc: [gibagwaaniiginoshiwaadig, gibagwaaniiginoshiwaadog]
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+2Pl+VocPl+Obv: [gibagwaaniiginoshiwaadig, gibagwaaniiginoshiwaadog]
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+2Pl+VocPl+Pl: [gibagwaaniiginoshiwaadig, gibagwaaniiginoshiwaadog]
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+3Obv+Pret+Loc: obagwaaniiginoshiniibaniing
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+3Obv+Pret+Obv: obagwaaniiginoshiniibaniin
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+3Obv+Pret+Pl: obagwaaniiginoshiniibaniin
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+3Obv+VocPl+Loc: [obagwaaniiginoshiniidig, obagwaaniiginoshiniidog]
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+3Obv+VocPl+Obv: [obagwaaniiginoshiniidig, obagwaaniiginoshiniidog]
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+3Obv+VocPl+Pl: [obagwaaniiginoshiniidig, obagwaaniiginoshiniidog]
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+3Pl+Pret+Loc: obagwaaniiginoshiwaabaniing
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+3Pl+Pret+Obv: obagwaaniiginoshiwaabaniin
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+3Pl+Pret+Pl: obagwaaniiginoshiwaabaniin
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+3Pl+VocPl+Loc: [obagwaaniiginoshiwaadig, obagwaaniiginoshiwaadog]
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+3Pl+VocPl+Obv: [obagwaaniiginoshiwaadig, obagwaaniiginoshiwaadog]
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+3Pl+VocPl+Pl: [obagwaaniiginoshiwaadig, obagwaaniiginoshiwaadog]
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+1Pl+Pret: nibagwaaniiginoonyimishinaaniban
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+1Pl+VocPl: [nibagwaaniiginoonyimishinaanidig, nibagwaaniiginoonyimishinaanidog]
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+1Pl+Pret: nibagwaaniiginoonsimishinaaniban
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+1Pl+VocPl: [nibagwaaniiginoonsimishinaanidig, nibagwaaniiginoonsimishinaanidog]
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+21+Pret: gibagwaaniiginoonyimishinaaniban
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+21+VocPl: [gibagwaaniiginoonyimishinaanidig, gibagwaaniiginoonyimishinaanidog]
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+2Pl+Pret: gibagwaaniiginoonyimishiwaaban
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+2Pl+VocPl: [gibagwaaniiginoonyimishiwaadig, gibagwaaniiginoonyimishiwaadog]
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+21+Pret: gibagwaaniiginoonsimishinaaniban
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+21+VocPl: [gibagwaaniiginoonsimishinaanidig, gibagwaaniiginoonsimishinaanidog]
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+2Pl+Pret: gibagwaaniiginoonsimishiwaaban
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+2Pl+VocPl: [gibagwaaniiginoonsimishiwaadig, gibagwaaniiginoonsimishiwaadog]
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3Obv+Pret: obagwaaniiginoonyimishiniiban
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3Obv+VocPl: [obagwaaniiginoonyimishiniidig, obagwaaniiginoonyimishiniidog]
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3Pl+Pret: obagwaaniiginoonyimishiwaaban
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3Pl+VocPl: [obagwaaniiginoonyimishiwaadig, obagwaaniiginoonyimishiwaadog]
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Obv+Pret: obagwaaniiginoonsimishiniiban
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Obv+VocPl: [obagwaaniiginoonsimishiniidig, obagwaaniiginoonsimishiniidog]
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Pl+Pret: obagwaaniiginoonsimishiwaaban
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Pl+VocPl: [obagwaaniiginoonsimishiwaadig, obagwaaniiginoonsimishiwaadog]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 7
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+1Pl+Loc: nibagwaaniiginoonyimishinaaning
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+1Pl+Obv: nibagwaaniiginoonyimishinaanin
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+1Pl+Pl: nibagwaaniiginoonyimishinaanin
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+1Pl+Loc: nibagwaaniiginoonsimishinaaning
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+1Pl+Obv: nibagwaaniiginoonsimishinaanin
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+1Pl+Pl: nibagwaaniiginoonsimishinaanin
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+21+Loc: gibagwaaniiginoonyimishinaaning
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+21+Obv: gibagwaaniiginoonyimishinaanin
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+21+Pl: gibagwaaniiginoonyimishinaanin
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+2Pl+Loc: gibagwaaniiginoonyimishiwaang
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+2Pl+Obv: gibagwaaniiginoonyimishiwaan
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+2Pl+Pl: gibagwaaniiginoonyimishiwaan
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+21+Loc: gibagwaaniiginoonsimishinaaning
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+21+Obv: gibagwaaniiginoonsimishinaanin
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+21+Pl: gibagwaaniiginoonsimishinaanin
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+2Pl+Loc: gibagwaaniiginoonsimishiwaang
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+2Pl+Obv: gibagwaaniiginoonsimishiwaan
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+2Pl+Pl: gibagwaaniiginoonsimishiwaan
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3Obv+Loc: obagwaaniiginoonyimishiniing
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3Obv+Obv: obagwaaniiginoonyimishiniin
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3Obv+Pl: obagwaaniiginoonyimishiniin
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3Pl+Loc: obagwaaniiginoonyimishiwaang
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3Pl+Obv: obagwaaniiginoonyimishiwaan
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3Pl+Pl: obagwaaniiginoonyimishiwaan
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Obv+Loc: obagwaaniiginoonsimishiniing
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Obv+Obv: obagwaaniiginoonsimishiniin
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Obv+Pl: obagwaaniiginoonsimishiniin
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Pl+Loc: obagwaaniiginoonsimishiwaang
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Pl+Obv: obagwaaniiginoonsimishiwaan
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Pl+Pl: obagwaaniiginoonsimishiwaan
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 6, 7
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: nibagwaaniiginoonyimishibaniing
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: nibagwaaniiginoonyimishibaniin
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: nibagwaaniiginoonyimishibaniin
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: nibagwaaniiginoonsimishibaniing
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: nibagwaaniiginoonsimishibaniin
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: nibagwaaniiginoonsimishibaniin
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: gibagwaaniiginoonyimishibaniing
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: gibagwaaniiginoonyimishibaniin
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: gibagwaaniiginoonyimishibaniin
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: gibagwaaniiginoonsimishibaniing
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: gibagwaaniiginoonsimishibaniin
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: gibagwaaniiginoonsimishibaniin
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: obagwaaniiginoonyimishibaniing
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: obagwaaniiginoonyimishibaniin
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: obagwaaniiginoonyimishibaniin
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: obagwaaniiginoonsimishibaniing
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: obagwaaniiginoonsimishibaniin
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: obagwaaniiginoonsimishibaniin
     X+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: ibagwaaniiginoonyimishibaniing
     X+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: ibagwaaniiginoonyimishibaniin
     X+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: ibagwaaniiginoonyimishibaniin
     X+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: ibagwaaniiginoonsimishibaniing
     X+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: ibagwaaniiginoonsimishibaniin
     X+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: ibagwaaniiginoonsimishibaniin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 5, 6, 7
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pos+1Pl+Pret+Loc: nibagwaaniiginoonyiminaanibaniing
